Nebraska, session 109, LB682.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB682 LB682
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-770, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-770 At the request of a parent or guardian, a school district
shall issue a certificate of attendance to a student who receives special
education services under the Special Education Act, who has reached
seventeen years of age, and who has not completed his or her
individualized education program plan. A school district shall allow a
student who receives a certificate of attendance under this section to
participate in the high school graduation ceremony of such high school
with students receiving high school diplomas. A student may receive only
one certificate of attendance and may participate in only one graduation
ceremony based on such certificate. The receipt of a certificate of
attendance pursuant to this section shall not affect a school district's
obligation to continue to provide special education services to a student
receiving such certificate.
This section does not preclude a student from receiving a high
school diploma by meeting the school district's graduation requirements
established pursuant to section 79-729 or in his or her individualized
education program plan or receiving a diploma of high school equivalency
under section 79-730 upon completing the requirements of such section.
The school district may allow a student who has previously participated
in a graduation ceremony based on a certificate of attendance to
participate in an additional graduation ceremony when such student
receives a high school diploma.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-770, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-